Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2908
Foreign limited cooperative association; name.

(1) A foreign limited cooperative association may register its name pursuant to section 21-2907 if the name is not the same as or deceptively similar to names that are unavailable under section 21-2906.

(2) A foreign limited cooperative association may register its name, or its name with any addition required by section 21-29,106, by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing an application:

(a) Setting forth its name, or its name with any addition required by section 21-29,106, the state or country of organization and date of its organization, and a brief description of the nature of the affairs in which it is engaged; and

(b) Accompanied by a certificate of existence or authorization from the state or country of organization.

(3) A foreign limited cooperative association whose registration is effective may qualify as a foreign limited cooperative association under its name or consent in a record to the use of its name by a limited cooperative association later organized under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act or by a foreign limited cooperative association later authorized to transact business in this state. The registration of the name terminates when the limited cooperative association is organized or the foreign limited cooperative association qualifies or consents to the qualification of another foreign limited cooperative association under the registered name.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 8.